Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-285
Public lands; occupation as townsite; entry, when authorized.

In all cases in which any of the public land of the United States has been or shall be selected and occupied as a townsite, if the inhabitants of such townsite shall be at the time incorporated, it shall be the duty of the corporate authorities of such city or village, or if not incorporated, then of the county judge of the county in which such townsite is situated, whenever called on by any of the occupants of such town, and the money for the entry of such townsite has been furnished, to enter such townsite under the Act of Congress in such case made and provided.

Laws 1907, c. 155, § 1, p. 486;

R.S.1913, § 6284;

C.S.1922, § 5803;

C.S.1929, § 76-804;

R.S.1943, § 76-285.